Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-208
Criminal identification; agents; power of Governor to appoint.

The Governor is hereby authorized to appoint such agents as may be necessary for carrying out the provisions of sections 29-208 to 29-210.

Laws 1921, c. 207, § 1, p. 739;

C.S.1922, § 9942;

C.S.1929, § 29-208;

R.S.1943, § 29-208.